Missouri, session 2026, HB1714.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 578.009, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 578.009, to read as follows:
578.009. 1. A person commits the offense of animal neglect if he or she:
(1) Has custody or ownership of an animal and fails to provide adequate care; [or]
(2) Has custody or ownership of an animal, excluding livestock as defined in
section 265.300, and fails to provide adequate control; or
(3) Knowingly abandons an animal in any place without making provisions for its
adequate care or adequate control.
2. The offense of animal neglect is a class C misdemeanor unless the person:
(1) Has previously been found guilty of an offense under this section, or an offense in
another jurisdiction which would constitute an offense under this section, in which case it is a
class B misdemeanor;
(2) Fails to provide adequate care or adequate control that results in property
damage of another, in which case it is a class B misdemeanor; however, if such damage
exceeds seven hundred fifty dollars, it is a class E felony;
(3) Fails to provide adequate care or adequate control that results in physical
injury, as defined in 556.061, to a person, in which case it is a class A misdemeanor;
(4) Fails to provide adequate care or adequate control that results in serious
physical injury, as defined in section 556.061, to a person, in which case it is a class E
felony; or
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 1714 2
(5) Fails to provide adequate care or adequate control that results in death to a
person, in which case it is a class D felony.
3. [All fines and penalties for a first finding of guilt under this section may be waived
by the court if the person found guilty of animal neglect shows that adequate, permanent
remedies for the neglect have been made. Reasonable costs incurred for the care and
maintenance of neglected animals may not be waived. This section shall not apply to the
provisions of section 578.007 or chapter 272.
4.] In addition to any other penalty imposed by this section, the court may order a
person found guilty of animal neglect to pay all reasonable costs and expenses necessary for:
(1) The care and maintenance of neglected animals within the person's custody or
ownership;
(2) The disposal of any dead or diseased animals within the person's custody or
ownership;
(3) The reduction of resulting organic debris affecting the immediate area of the
neglect; and
(4) The avoidance or minimization of any public health risks created by the neglect of
the animals.
4. Nothing in this section shall be construed to apply to the acts or facilities
exempted under section 578.007.
✔